trunk/resultats/catalan.aff
# Pronoms personals enclítics darrere consonant
SFX C Y 81
SFX C   0      -me         .                # posar-me
SFX C   0      -nos        .                # posar-nos
SFX C   0      -te         .                # posar-te
SFX C   0      -vos        .                # posar-vos
SFX C   0      -se         .                # posar-se
SFX C   0      -lo         .                # posar-lo
SFX C   0      -la         .                # posar-la
SFX C   0      -li         .                # posar-li
SFX C   0      -los        .                # posar-los
SFX C   0      -les        .                # posar-les
SFX C   0      -ho         .                # posar-ho
SFX C   0      -hi         .                # posar-hi
SFX C   0      -ne         .                # posar-ne
SFX C   0      -se't       .                # posar-se't
SFX C   0      -se-us      .                # posar-se-us
SFX C   0      -se'm       .                # posar-se'm
SFX C   0      -te'm       .                # posar-te'm
SFX C   0      -vos-em     .                # posar-vos-em
SFX C   0      -se'ns      .                # posar-se'ns
SFX C   0      -te'ns      .                # posar-te'ns
SFX C   0      -vos-ens    .                # posar-vos-ens
SFX C   0      -se'l       .                # posar-se'l
SFX C   0      -te'l       .                # posar-te'l
SFX C   0      -vos-el     .                # posar-vos-el
SFX C   0      -me'l       .                # posar-me'l
SFX C   0      -nos-el     .                # posar-nos-el
SFX C   0      -los-el     .                # posar-los-el
SFX C   0      -l'hi       .                # posar-l'hi
SFX C   0      -se'ls      .                # posar-se'ls
SFX C   0      -te'ls      .                # posar-te'ls
SFX C   0      -vos-els    .                # posar-vos-els
SFX C   0      -me'ls      .                # posar-me'ls
SFX C   0      -nos-els    .                # posar-nos-els
SFX C   0      -los-els    .                # posar-los-els
SFX C   0      -los-hi     .                # posar-los-hi
SFX C   0      -se-la      .                # posar-se-la
SFX C   0      -te-la      .                # posar-te-la
SFX C   0      -vos-la     .                # posar-vos-la
SFX C   0      -me-la      .                # posar-me-la
SFX C   0      -nos-la     .                # posar-nos-la
SFX C   0      -los-la     .                # posar-los-la
SFX C   0      -la-hi      .                # posar-la-hi
SFX C   0      -se-les     .                # posar-se-les
SFX C   0      -te-les     .                # posar-te-les
SFX C   0      -vos-les    .                # posar-vos-les
SFX C   0      -me-les     .                # posar-me-les
SFX C   0      -nos-les    .                # posar-nos-les
SFX C   0      -los-les    .                # posar-los-les
SFX C   0      -les-hi     .                # posar-les-hi
SFX C   0      -se-li      .                # posar-se-li
SFX C   0      -te-li      .                # posar-te-li
SFX C   0      -vos-li     .                # posar-vos-li
SFX C   0      -me-li      .                # posar-me-li
SFX C   0      -nos-li     .                # posar-nos-li
SFX C   0      -s'ho       .                # posar-s'ho
SFX C   0      -t'ho       .                # posar-t'ho
SFX C   0      -vos-ho     .                # posar-vos-ho
SFX C   0      -m'ho       .                # posar-m'ho
SFX C   0      -nos-ho     .                # posar-nos-ho
SFX C   0      -los-ho     .                # posar-los-ho
SFX C   0      -li-ho      .                # posar-li-ho
SFX C   0      -se'n       .                # posar-se'n
SFX C   0      -te'n       .                # posar-te'n
SFX C   0      -vos-en     .                # posar-vos-en
SFX C   0      -me'n       .                # posar-me'n
SFX C   0      -nos-en     .                # posar-nos-en
SFX C   0      -l'en       .                # posar-l'en
SFX C   0      -los-en     .                # posar-los-en
SFX C   0      -la'n       .                # posar-la'n
SFX C   0      -les-en     .                # posar-les-en
SFX C   0      -li'n       .                # posar-li'n
SFX C   0      -s'hi       .                # posar-s'hi
SFX C   0      -t'hi       .                # posar-t'hi
SFX C   0      -vos-hi     .                # posar-vos-hi
SFX C   0      -m'hi       .                # posar-m'hi
SFX C   0      -nos-hi     .                # posar-nos-hi
SFX C   0      -l'hi       .                # posar-l'hi
SFX C   0      -los-hi     .                # posar-los-hi
SFX C   0      -la-hi      .                # posar-la-hi
SFX C   0      -les-hi     .                # posar-les-hi
SFX C   0      -n'hi       .                # posar-n'hi
