trunk/resultats/catalan.dic
abarroteu/C
aboleix/C
abreujar/CY
abstergiu/C
acanonen/C
acatxin/C
aclameeix/C
acomboiar/CY
acoreu/C
acubillen/C
adelitau/C
adoctrinen/C
adscriguin/C
afanant/C
aferrussem/C
afligim/C
afusellem/C
agenollin/C
agranant/C
aguerrisquen/C
aixecar/CY
alar/CEVY
alfabetitzeu/C
alleven/C
alterem/C
amagrim/C
amarrant/C
amin/C
amorriem/C
amuntegant/C
angelitzen/C
anostrin/C
apaivaguin/C
aparroquianau/C
apeteixin/C
aplaudint/C
aporuguin/C
apromptau/C
aquilotem/C
arilant/C
arramasseu/C
arreglen/C
arribem/C
arrossinin/C
asfaltar/CY
assamarrin/C
assesten/C
assosseguin/C
ataquinem/C
atiant/C
atrapen/C
auditau/C
avancen/C
avilar/CY
badallar/C
balbucegin/C
banquetegin/C
barrar/C
batallant/CE
beleu/C
besllaurau/C
bisem/C
bloquegen/C
bombollegem/C
bornejar/C
botzinin/C
breguejau/C
bronzegin/C
brunzinen/C
burjant/C
cabrafigant/C
calabruixin/C
calibren/C
campem/C
canviar/C
capiculem/C
capterreren/C
carcompreu/C
carrisquejar/C
cataloguem/C
celebrem/C
cessant/CE
circuleu/C
clapix/C
cloguin/C
cobriu/C
colen/C
col·lacionin/C
combregant/C
compagineu/C
compleixin/C
compungix/C
concreteu/C
confeccionar/C
confrontin/C
conjugar/C
conscienciïn/C
constin/C
contextualitzar/C
contraforjant/C
contrariant/C
conversegem/C
copsen/C
cornau/C
corruquegen/C
crebantar/C
crismant/C
cuclegeu/C
cursen/C
davallem/C
decebeu/C
defallint/C
degotant/CE
delimitant/C
denegin/C
deportin/C
desabonau/C
desacostumin/C
desagregant/C
desamistanceu/C
desaprenguem/C
desarrapen/C
desarticulin/C
desavinguen/C
desbosquen/C
descambuixin/C
descasar/C
desclucant/C
descomptau/C
desconvenint/C
descrosterau/C
desdoneu/C
desembalumeu/C
desemboquem/C
desembromau/C
desemmerletem/C
desemparaulau/C
desempesquen/C
desempudeir/C
desencantau/C
desencastau/C
desencofren/C
desencubellar/C
desenfarfegar/C
desenfustar/C
desengresquen/C
desenlleganyeu/C
desenredem/C
desensitgin/C
desenterbolix/C
desenvalisar/C
desespessim/C
desfeinen/C
desfosforar/C
desgraciant/C
deshipotecant/C
desinhibeixin/C
desllavasseu/C
desmanen/C
desmitifiquen/C
desnierar/C
desoperculen/C
despampolant/C
despersonalitzen/C
despreocupant/C
dessalen/C
destaquen/C
destorçau/C
desvaguen/C
desviu/CS
devaneixin/C
diferir/C
diluviant/C
discernir/C
dispergesquin/C
distanciïn/C
divorcien/C
donejant/C
dropegeu/C
efluir/CY
eixauguen/C
electrocutem/C
embadalir/CY
embandereu/C
embarrotem/C
emblanquinem/C
embordeir/CY
embotisquen/C
embrossem/C
emmagatzemant/C
emmantellem/C
emmetzinen/C
emocionar/CY
empapatxem/C
empastissar/CY
empentar/CY
empileu/C
emplugem/C
emporxem/C
empudenteixin/C
enasprem/C
encalaixonem/C
encanastrin/C
encaputxin/C
encartutxin/C
encepegant/C
encintem/C
encofiem/C
enconxen/C
encreuerau/C
endentar/CY
endollen/C
enfarcellau/C
enferint/C
enfollix/C
enfranqueix/C
engabiem/C
engandallen/C
engegantim/C
engordeixin/C
engrevesquin/C
enguerxinen/C
enllagrimin/C
enlleïm/C
ennegrim/C
enrabien/C
enrederint/C
enrivetem/C
ensaben/C
ensementau/C
ensonyau/C
entabanant/C
entendin/C
entoneu/C
entreabaltint/C
entreguardant/C
entrepassegant/C
entrevegem/CZ
entusiasmant/C
enverdisquen/C
envigorim/C
enxarpeu/C
ergotitzeu/C
esbagoteu/C
esbarrin/C
esbomben/C
esbraven/C
esbutzem/C
escalfar/CY
escanvieu/C
escardussin/C
escarufegem/C
esclafassau/C
escollarant/C
escorporant/C
escrostonau/C
escuquin/C
esfondrar/CY
esgarrinyeu/C
esgrilleu/C
esllomau/C
esmitjant/C
espadellant/C
esparveren/C
espelleringau/C
esperitant/C
espignen/C
espitllau/C
espoltrin/C
espunyem/C
esquerdissau/C
estabulen/C
estatitzar/CY
estibar/CY
estofeu/C
estrangeritzin/C
estronqueu/C
esvelleguin/C
europeïtzar/CY
excarcerin/C
execreu/C
exonerau/C
explorant/C
extirpen/C
fabriquen/C
familiaritzar/C
fatxegen/C
fenomenalitzar/C
figurem/C
fingiu/C
flamegeu/C
flogisticau/C
folien/C
foregeu/C
fosforegin/C
franquegeu/C
frisant/C
fumem/C
gabiegin/C
galzen/C
garfint/C
gasegen/C
gelifiqueu/C
girigueu/C
golafregeu/C
granen/C
gremolejau/C
grunyim/C
guindant/C
halin/C
higienitzant/C
hospitalitzau/C
imaginen/C
impel·lint/C
imprimint/C
incoem/C
indicar/CY
infectau/C
infringeix/C
insacular/CY
instil·lar/CY
intercedir/CY
interviuant/C
inventeu/C
irritar/CY
joguinegin/C
laborau/C
leviguen/C
lladronegeu/C
llangueix/C
llenegant/C
llisteu/C
lluiteu/C
maganyau/C
malden/C
malmenen/C
mamussar/C
mantegin/C
marcix/C
marxem/C
matxuqueu/C
menejant/C
merceritzant/C
metastatitzeu/C
minant/C
mitigau/C
mollegem/C
morigereu/C
mudau/C
murriegem/C
naspreu/C
netejau/C
nodrim/C
nuclearitzeu/C
obsedeixin/C
occitanitzeu/C
olivau/C
optimitzen/C
ormegin/C
oxiden/C
palesen/C
panteixen/C
parifiquin/C
passiveu/C
pecau/C
penar/C
percaçant/C
perim/C
perseguim/C
pesau/C
picolar/C
pioquegin/C
plaeu/C
plaçar/C
pobretejant/C
polsen/C
porquegin/C
potejau/C
predominau/C
premuneixin/C
presideixin/C
previnguin/C
produir/C
promocionau/C
prorrompem/C
pruir/C
punyin/C
queixem/C
racioneu/C
rampinyant/C
rasen/C
reaccionant/C
reballar/C
rebordonim/C
recamar/C
reclameu/C
recomprem/C
recordant/C
redargüesquin/C
reedificar/C
reestructurant/C
reflexionen/C
refugiant/C
reglamentar/C
regurgitin/C
rejoveneix/C
rellucar/C
remolcant/C
renesquem/C
repairen/C
repetiu/C
reprenguen/C
requerix/C
resolguin/C
ressentim/C
resultant/CE
retopem/C
retroneu/C
revelar/C
revifen/C
ribotejar/C
rodolen/C
ronquejar/C
rubricar/C
sabotejar/C
salinar/C
saltironegeu/C
saponifiqueu/C
sedegem/C
sentenciar/C
servint/C
simplifiquin/C
soberguegen/C
sobreexcedint/C
sobresatureu/C
sodomitzar/C
solidaritzem/C
somrieu/C
soscavin/C
sotsarrendeu/C
sublimant/C
subvencionar/C
sulseixin/C
sureu/C
tallgirar/C
taral·larejar/C
taülegem/C
temprin/C
terminant/CE
tibin/C
tol/CS
torcegeu/C
totalitzar/C
traguin/C
transformant/C
transvesteix/C
traspuïn/C
tremolar/C
triau/C
triturem/C
truncar/C
ujau/C
universalitzin/C
vagabundegen/C
vaquen/C
venguen/C
verolant/C
viciem/C
virau/C
volem/C
xafen/C
xarrupegem/C
xinen/C
xuclin/C
